Washington statutes.
RCW 26.11.050

Attorneys' fees—Transportation costs.

(1)(a) For the purposes of RCW 26.11.020 through 26.11.040, the court shall, on motion of the respondent, order the petitioner to pay a reasonable amount for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the respondent in advance and prior to any hearing, unless the court finds, considering the financial resources of all parties, that it would be unjust to do so.

(b) Regardless of the financial resources of the parties, if the court finds that a petition for visitation was brought in bad faith or without reasonable basis in light of the requirements of RCW 26.11.020 through 26.11.040, the court shall order the petitioner to pay a reasonable amount for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the respondent.

(2) If visitation is granted, the court shall order the petitioner to pay all transportation costs associated with visitation.

[ 2018 c 183 s 5.]